Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 4 Mandatory Child Abuse Reports
37-1-408. Development of guidelines for identifying and reporting signs of child abuse, child sexual abuse, and human trafficking of children — Annual child abuse training program for teachers.

By January 1, 2019, the department of children's services shall develop guidelines on the best practices for identifying and reporting signs of child abuse, child sexual abuse, and human trafficking in which the victim is a child. The department of education shall use the guidelines to identify child abuse training programs appropriate for teachers. The programs identified by the department of education must train teachers on the common signs of child abuse, child sexual abuse, and human trafficking in which the victim is a child; how to identify children at risk of abuse, sexual abuse, or human trafficking; maintenance of professional and appropriate relationships with students; and the requirements for reporting suspected child abuse and sexual misconduct.

Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, each LEA and each public charter school shall ensure its teachers complete a child abuse training program identified by the department of education pursuant to subsection (a), or a training program that meets the guidelines established by the department of children's services pursuant to subsection (a), as part of the teacher's annual in-service training. Each LEA and each public charter school shall annually report its compliance with this section to the department of education.

Acts 2018, ch. 983, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-408 (Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 343, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 37-1207, 37-1208; Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 40; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 22, 28-30, 32; 1988, ch. 964, § 1; 1992, ch. 833, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73), concerning the screening of child care providers by the state registry, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 17, effective July 1, 2000.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 983, § 2. May 21, 2018.

37-1-409. Reports confidential — Authorized access to information — Penalty for violation.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and §§ 37-1-612 and 37-5-107, reports of harm made under this part and the identity of the reporter are confidential, except when the juvenile court in which the investigation report is filed, in its discretion, determines the testimony of the person reporting to be material to an indictment or conviction.

Except as may be ordered by the juvenile court as herein provided, the name of any person reporting child abuse shall not be released to any person, other than employees of the department or other child protection team members responsible for child protective services, the abuse registry, or the appropriate district attorney general upon subpoena of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, without the written consent of the person reporting. Such person's identity shall be irrelevant to any civil proceeding and shall, therefore, not be subject to disclosure by order of any court. This shall not prohibit the subpoenaing of a person reporting child abuse when deemed necessary by the district attorney general or the department to protect a child who is the subject of a report; provided, that the fact that such person made the report is not disclosed.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, it is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part, to disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any list or the name of, or any information concerning, persons receiving services pursuant to this part, or any information concerning a report or investigation of a report of harm under this part, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files or communications of the department or divisions thereof acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

In addition to such other purposes as may be directly connected with the administration of this part, the department shall also grant access to information to those persons specified in § 37-1-612.

The department may confirm whether a child abuse or neglect investigation has been commenced, but may not divulge, except as permitted under this part, any details about the case, including, but not limited to, the name of the reporter, the alleged victim, or the alleged perpetrator.

The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out the following purposes:

The establishment of administrative and due process procedures for the disclosure of the contents of its files and the results of its investigations for the purpose of protecting children from child sexual abuse, physical abuse, emotional abuse, or neglect; and

For other purposes directly connected with the administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, cooperation with schools, child care agencies, residential and institutional child care providers, child protection agencies, individuals providing care or protection for the child, medical and mental health personnel providing care for the child and the child's family and the perpetrator of any form of child abuse or neglect, law enforcement agencies, the judicial and correctional systems, and for cooperation with scientific and governmental research on child abuse and neglect.

Except as specifically provided in this chapter, nothing in this chapter shall prevent the department from sharing information with the district attorney general and law enforcement personnel for the purpose of cooperating with a law enforcement investigation. Information from departmental records that is shared with the district attorney general or law enforcement by the department shall remain confidential to the same extent that information not shared with the district attorney general and law enforcement is confidential. Unless otherwise ordered by a court, or to the extent that such information is used for criminal prosecution, or to the extent required under the Tennessee rules of criminal procedure after criminal charges have been filed, any portion of shared information that does not become part of a court record shall remain confidential to the same extent as information not shared by the department remains confidential.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 343, § 4; Acts 1978, ch. 886, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 37-1208, 37-1209; Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 42; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 15, 23; 1988, ch. 964, § 3; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2000, ch. 981, § 51; 2005, ch. 391, § 11; 2008, ch. 1146, § 3; 2009, ch. 358, § 3.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse autopsy reports exempted from confidentiality requirements, §37-1-403.

Confidentiality of child sexual abuse records and reports, §37-1-612.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VIII. Child Abuse (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 493 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Confidentiality of department of children's services complaints. OAG 13-93, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (11/27/13).

37-1-410. Immunity from civil or criminal liability for reporting abuse — Damages for employment change because of making report.

IF a health care provider makes a report of harm, as required by § 37-1-403; AND

IF the report arises from an examination of the child performed by the health care provider in the course of rendering professional care or treatment of the child; OR

IF the health care provider who is highly qualified by experience in the field of child abuse and neglect, as evidenced by special training or credentialing, renders a second opinion at the request of the department or any law enforcement agency, whether or not the health care provider has examined the child, rendered care or treatment, or made the report of harm; THEN

The health care provider shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action that is based solely upon:

The health care provider's decision to report what the provider believed to be harm;

The health care provider's belief that reporting the harm was required by law;

The fact that a report of harm was made; or

The fact that an opinion as described in this subdivision (a)(1) was requested and provided.

For the purposes of this subsection (a), by providing a second opinion, a report, information or records at the request of the department or any law enforcement agency the health care provider has satisfied all requirements to make a report of harm as required by §§ 37-1-403 and 37-1-605.

As used in this subsection (a), “health care provider” means any physician, osteopathic physician, medical examiner, chiropractor, nurse, hospital personnel, mental health professional or other health care professional.

Nothing in this subsection (a) shall be construed to confer any immunity upon a health care provider for a criminal or civil action arising out of the treatment of the child about whom the report of harm was made.

IF absolute immunity is not conferred upon a person pursuant to subdivision (a)(1); AND

IF, acting in good faith, the person makes a report of harm, as required by §37-1-403; THEN

The person shall not be liable in any civil or criminal action that is based solely upon:

The person's decision to report what the person believed to be harm;

The person's belief that reporting the harm was required by law; or

The fact that a report of harm was made.

Because of the overriding public policy to encourage all persons to report the neglect of or harm or abuse to children, any person upon whom good faith immunity is conferred pursuant to this subdivision (a)(5) shall be presumed to have acted in good faith in making a report of harm.

No immunity conferred pursuant to this subsection (a) shall attach if the person reporting the harm perpetrated or inflicted the abuse or caused the neglect.

A person furnishing a report, information or records as required, requested, or authorized under this part shall have the same immunity and the same scope of immunity with respect to testimony such person may be required to give or may give in any judicial or administrative proceeding or in any communications with the department or any law enforcement official as is otherwise conferred by this subsection (a) upon the person for making the report of harm.

If the person furnishing a report, information or records during the normal course of the person's duties as required or authorized or requested under this part is different from the person originally reporting the harm, then the person furnishing the report, information or records shall have the same immunity and the same scope of immunity with respect to testimony the person may be required to give or may give in any judicial or administrative proceeding or in any communications with the department or any law enforcement official as is otherwise conferred by this subsection (a) upon the person who made the original report of harm.

Any person reporting under this part shall have a civil cause of action against any person who causes a detrimental change in the employment status of the reporting party by reason of the report.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 343, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., §§ 37-1209, 37-1210; Acts 2001, ch. 351, § 2; 2008, ch. 1060, § 1.

Cross-References. Immunity from liability for reporting child sexual abuse, §37-1-613.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.71.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VIII. Child Abuse (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 493 (1978).

37-1-411. Evidentiary privileges not applicable to child abuse cases.

Neither the husband-wife privilege as preserved in §24-1-201, nor the psychiatrist-patient privilege as set forth in §24-1-207, nor the psychologist-patient privilege as set forth in §63-11-213 is a ground for excluding evidence regarding harm or the cause of harm to a child in any dependency and neglect proceeding resulting from a report of such harm under §37-1-403 or a criminal prosecution for severe child abuse.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 343, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 37-1210, 37-1211; Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 20.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child sexual abuse cases, §37-1-614.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Law Reviews.

Hell Hath No Fury Like a Spouse Scorned — A Focus on Tennessee's Marital Privilege for Confidential Communications, 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 57 (1989).

37-1-412. Violation of duty to report — Power of juvenile court — Penalty.

Any person who knowingly fails to make a report required by § 37-1-403 commits an offense.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

A second or subsequent violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class E felony.

Any person who intentionally fails to make a report required by § 37-1-403 commits a Class E felony.

A juvenile court having reasonable cause to believe that a person is guilty of violating this section may have the person brought before the court either by summons or by warrant. If the defendant pleads not guilty, the juvenile court judge shall bind the defendant over to the grand jury.

If the defendant pleads guilty to a first offense under subdivision (a)(1) and waives, in writing, indictment, presentment, grand jury investigation, and trial by jury, the juvenile court judge shall sentence the defendant with a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 343, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 37-1211, 37-1-1212; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 2005, ch. 256, § 1; 2019, ch. 499, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section which read, “(a) Any person who knowingly fails to make a report required by §37-1-403 commits a Class A misdemeanor.“(b) A juvenile court having reasonable cause to believe that a person is guilty of violating this section may have the person brought before the court either by summons or by warrant. If the defendant pleads not guilty, the juvenile court judge shall bind the defendant over to the grand jury. If the defendant pleads guilty and waives, in writing, indictment, presentment, grand jury investigation, and trial by jury, the juvenile court judge shall sentence the defendant under this section with a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 499, § 10. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Child abuse and neglect, penalty, §39-15-401.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 1 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.1.

37-1-413. False reporting of child sexual abuse or false accusation that a child has sustained any wound, injury, disability or physical or mental condition caused by brutality, abuse or neglect — Penalty.

Any person who either verbally or by written or printed communication knowingly and maliciously reports, or causes, encourages, aids, counsels or procures another to report, a false accusation of child sexual abuse or false accusation that a child has sustained any wound, injury, disability or physical or mental condition caused by brutality, abuse or neglect commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 43; 1989, ch. 591, § 33; 2008, ch. 1171, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

37-1-414. Persons working with children — Fingerprinting — Release of investigative and criminal records.

A religious, charitable, scientific, educational, athletic or youth service institution or organization may require any person, who applies to work with children as a volunteer or as a paid employee, to do one (1) or more of the following:

Agree to the release of all investigative records to such religious, charitable, scientific, educational, athletic, or youth service institution or organization for examination for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of criminal violation information contained on an application to work for such institution or organization;

Supply fingerprint samples and submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation; or

Attend a comprehensive youth protection training program that includes adult training on recognition, disclosure, reporting and prevention of abuse and submit to character, employment, education and reference checks.

Any costs incurred by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation in conducting such investigation of applicants shall be paid by the religious, charitable, scientific, educational, or athletic institution or organization requesting such investigation and information. Payment of such costs are to be made in accordance with the provisions of § 38-6-103.

Acts 1993, ch. 350, § 2; 1995, ch. 325, § 1; 2003, ch. 30, §§ 1, 2.